Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
90-274
Game and Parks Commission; convey
property to village of Ayr.

The
Game and Parks Commission is authorized to convey to the village of Ayr for
public park purposes the following described real estate, now known as Crystal
Lake State Recreation Area, situated in the county of Adams, in the State
of Nebraska, to wit:

(1) That part of the southeast
quarter of section 28, township 6 north, range 10 west of the 6th principal
meridian, in Adams County, Nebraska, described as follows: Begin at a stone
at the northeast corner of the southeast quarter of section 28, township 6
north, range 10 west; thence south along the section line 254 feet to a point
where the south right-of-way line of the Burlington-Northern Railroad intersects
the said section line, said point being the point of beginning for the parcel
herein conveyed; thence northwesterly along the south right-of-way line of
the Burlington-Northern Railroad, 648 feet to an iron pin; thence left 95
degrees, 28 minutes, 414.7 feet to an iron pin; thence left 38 degrees, 21
minutes, 324.2 feet; thence right 57 degrees, 15 minutes, 805.8 feet to an
iron pin; thence right 60 degrees, 13 minutes, 48.9 feet to an iron pin; thence
left 51 degrees, 20 minutes, 1,026.7 feet to an iron pin; thence left 62 degrees,
21 minutes, 208.9 feet to an iron pin on the south side of section 28; thence
left 58 degrees, 38 minutes, 186.5 feet along the section line to an iron
pin; thence left 48 degrees, 22 minutes, 371.7 feet to an iron pin; thence
left 21 degrees, 30 minutes, 574 feet to an iron pin; thence right 70 degrees,
20 minutes, 605.8 feet to an iron pin on the section line between sections
27 and 28; thence north along said section line 1,588 feet to the point of
beginning, containing 32.79 acres more or less;

(2) That part of the southwest quarter
of section 27, township 6 north, range 10 west, in Adams County, Nebraska,
described as follows: Begin at a stone at the northwest corner of the southwest
quarter of section 27, township 6 north, range 10 west; thence south along
the section line 254 feet to a point where the south right-of-way line of
the Burlington-Northern Railroad intersects the said section line, said point
being the point of beginning for the parcel herein conveyed; thence southeasterly
along the south right-of-way line of said railroad 265.7 feet to an iron pin;
thence right 81 degrees, 14 minutes, 272 feet to an iron pin; thence left
52 degrees, 50 minutes, 151 feet to an iron pin; thence left 12 degrees, 165
feet to an iron pin; thence right 19 degrees, 06 minutes, 211.5 feet to an
iron pin; thence right 6 degrees, 36 minutes, 132 feet to an iron pin; thence
right 6 degrees, 34 minutes, 198.2 feet to an iron pin; thence left 6 degrees,
35 minutes, 198 feet to an iron pin; thence right 10 degrees, 22 minutes,
132.3 feet to an iron pin; thence right 13 degrees, 54 minutes, 132 feet to
an iron pin; thence right 7 degrees, 15 minutes, 132 feet; thence right 13
degrees, 05 minutes, 120.5 feet; thence left 15 degrees, 28 minutes, 131.8
feet; thence right 31 degrees, 10 minutes, 66 feet; thence right 34 degrees,
14 minutes, 99 feet; thence right 23 degrees, 04 minutes, 157.8 feet; thence
right 19 degrees, 19 minutes, 264 feet; thence right 9 degrees, 20 minutes,
642.6 feet to a point on the north and south dividing line between sections
27 and 28 and 812 feet north of the southwest corner of section 27; thence
north along the section line, 1,588 feet to the place of beginning, containing
30.22 acres; and

(3)
That part of the southwest quarter of section 27, township 6 north, range
10 west of the 6th principal meridian, in Adams County, Nebraska, more particularly
described as follows: To ascertain the point of beginning, begin at the northwest
corner of the southwest quarter of section 27, township 6 north, range 10
west; thence south along the section line 254 feet of the point where the
south right-of-way line of the Burlington-Northern Railroad intersects the
said section line; thence southeasterly along the south right-of-way line
of said railroad 265.70 feet; thence deflecting right 81 degrees, 14 minutes,
for a distance of 55.63 feet to the actual point of beginning; thence continuing
on the same course 216.37 feet; thence deflecting left 52 degrees, 50 minutes,
for a distance of 38.57 feet; thence deflecting left 127 degrees, 01 minute
for a distance of 130.48 feet; thence deflecting left 8 degrees, 40 minutes,
for a distance of 59.87 feet; thence deflecting left 15 degrees, 24 minutes,
for a distance of 54.80 feet to the actual point of beginning and containing
0.154 acres, a little more or a little less as surveyed by Edwin D. Benjamin.

If the village of Ayr
ceases to operate the lands conveyed as a public park and recreation area,
title to such lands shall revert to the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 2011, LB563, § 1.